District of Columbia statutes.
47-1029

Daughters of American Revolution — Square 173.

That the property situated in square no. 173, in Washington City, District of Columbia, occupied on February 27, 1903, by the Daughters of the American Revolution is hereby exempt from all taxation so long as the same is so occupied and used, subject to the provisions of § 47-1002, providing for exemptions of church and school property, and acts amendatory thereof.

Feb. 27, 1903, 32 Stat. 907, ch. 852
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-1029.
1973 Ed., § 47-822.